Georgia statutes. 
Whenever an audit of the financial affairs of a county or municipal corporation or of an officer, board, department, unit, or other political subdivision of a county or municipal corporation is made pursuant to a requirement or to an authorization otherwise provided by law, the audit report shall include the auditor's unqualified opinion upon the presentation of the financial position and the result of the operations of the governmental unit or office which is audited. If the auditor is unable to express an unqualified opinion, he or she shall so state and shall further detail the reasons for qualification or disclaimer of opinion. All such audits shall be conducted in conformity with generally accepted government auditing standards.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 883, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 464, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1083, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Minimum budget and auditing requirements for counties, municipalities, and other entities, T. 36, C. 81.

Regulation of accountants, T. 43, C. 3.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1994, p. 1083, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "No state agency shall make or transmit any state grant funds to any local government which has failed to provide all the audits required by law within the preceding five years."

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sufficiency of audit. - An audit of the financial affairs of a county or municipality, or an officer, board, department, unit, or other political subdivision of a county or municipality made pursuant to a requirement or authorization provided by law, is of legal efficacy for purposes of such requirement or authorization if that audit includes either the auditor's unqualified opinion upon the presentation of the financial position and the result of the operations of that county, or a detailed explanation for qualification or disclaimer of opinion. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-232.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2089.

36-60-9. Investigation of business for issuance of county or municipal license; criminal sanction for violation.

Statute text

(a) No person shall investigate a business for the purpose of providing information to a county or municipal corporation of this state, which information is used in determining whether or not such business shall receive a business or similar license issued pursuant to the valid exercise of the police power of the county or municipal corporation, when such person is employed by or contracting with the county or municipal corporation to make investigations of the type specified in this subsection and such person has been employed by or is then employed by the particular individual business which the person is investigating.

(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 1197, §§ 1, 2.)

36-60-10. Annual meeting and agreement between county and city representatives as to services in portion of city within county.

Statute text

(a) Representatives of the governing authority of any county in this state which contains the smaller portion of the population of a city with a total population of 350,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census shall meet annually, prior to January 1, with representatives of the governing authority of such city to develop an agreement between the governing authorities on the following matters:

(1) The services to be provided during the following calendar year by the county and by the city to the portion of the city that lies within the county; and

(2) The method of dispatching services during the following calendar year to the portion of the city that lies within the county. Agreement on this matter shall provide a uniform procedure for dispatching services and shall include an agreement as to all street addresses in such portion of the city.

(b) Any agreements developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be in writing.

(c) The first annual meeting required by this Code section shall be held prior to January 1, 1977.

History

(Ga. L. 1976, p. 3137, §§ 1-3; Code 1981, § 36-60-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 42; Ga. L. 1991, p. 989, § 4.)

36-60-11. Attorney General to receive a copy of any submission to the United States Department of Justice pursuant to federal Voting Rights Act of 1965.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 6-6/HB 252.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Code 1981, § 36-60-11, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1432, § 1.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.'"

36-60-12. Electronic security systems; installation, service, operation, sale, or lease by counties or municipal corporations.

Statute text

No county or municipal corporation shall install, service, maintain, operate, sell, or lease as lessor any burglar alarm system, fire alarm system, or other electronic security system on private property if a private contractor licensed to do business within the county or municipality offers such systems or services to the public within such county or municipality. The provisions of this Code section shall not prohibit a county or municipal corporation from installing, servicing, maintaining, or operating a burglar alarm system, fire alarm system, or other electronic security system on any property owned or leased by such county or municipal corporation. This Code section shall not apply to any county or municipality offering electronic security systems on January 1, 1988. This Code section shall not prevent volunteer fire departments from selling or leasing battery operated fire detection equipment or fire extinguishers in their service areas. Any person violating this Code section or expending county or municipal funds in violation of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-12, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1847, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 36.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Two 1988 Acts added a new Code Section 36-60-12. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the Code section enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1847 has retained the Code Section 36-60-12 designation and the Code section enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1954 has been redesignated as Code Section 36-60-13.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 55 repealed Ga. L. 1988, p. 1847, § 2, relating to the power of volunteer fire departments to sell or lease battery operated fire detection equipment or fire extinguishers in their service areas. For present provisions, see the fourth sentence of this Code section.

36-60-13. Multiyear lease, purchase, or lease-purchase contracts.

Statute text

(a) Each county or municipality in this state shall be authorized to enter into multiyear lease, purchase, or lease-purchase contracts of all kinds for the acquisition of goods, materials, real and personal property, services, and supplies, provided that any such contract shall contain provisions for the following:

(1) The contract shall terminate absolutely and without further obligation on the part of the county or municipality at the close of the calendar or fiscal year in which it was executed and at the close of each succeeding calendar or fiscal year for which it may be renewed as provided in this Code section;

(2) The contract may provide for automatic renewal unless positive action is taken by the county or municipality to terminate such contract, and the nature of such action shall be determined by the county or municipality and specified in the contract;

(3) The contract shall state the total obligation of the county or municipality for the calendar or fiscal year of execution and shall further state the total obligation which will be incurred in each calendar or fiscal year renewal term, if renewed; and

(4) The contract shall provide that title to any supplies, materials, equipment, or other personal property shall remain in the vendor until fully paid for by the county or municipality.

(b) In addition to the provisions enumerated in subsection (a) of this Code section, any contract authorized by this Code section may include:

(1) A provision which requires that the contract will terminate immediately and absolutely at such time as appropriated and otherwise unobligated funds are no longer available to satisfy the obligations of the county or municipality under the contract; or

(2) Any other provision reasonably necessary to protect the interests of the county or municipality.

(c) Any contract developed under this Code section containing the provisions enumerated in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be deemed to obligate the county or municipality only for those sums payable during the calendar or fiscal year of execution or, in the event of a renewal by the county or municipality, for those sums payable in the individual calendar or fiscal year renewal term.

(d) No contract developed and executed pursuant to this Code section shall be deemed to create a debt of the county or municipality for the payment of any sum beyond the calendar or fiscal year of execution or, in the event of a renewal, beyond the calendar or fiscal year of such renewal.

(e) No contract developed and executed pursuant to this Code section may be delivered if the principal portion of such contract, when added to the amount of debt incurred by any county or municipality pursuant to Article IX, Section V, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia, exceeds 10 percent of the assessed value of all taxable property within such county or municipality.

(f) No contract developed and executed pursuant to this Code section may be delivered if the real or personal property being so financed has been the subject of a referendum which failed to receive the approval of the voters of the county or municipality within the immediately preceding four calendar years, unless such real or personal property is required to be financed pursuant to a federal or state court order, or imminent threat thereof, as certified by the governing authority of the county or municipality.

(g) No contract developed and executed pursuant to this Code section with respect to the acquisition of real property may be delivered unless a public hearing has been held by the county or municipality after two weeks' notice published in a newspaper of general circulation within the county or municipality.

(h) (1) On or after July 1, 2000, no contract developed and executed or renewed, refinanced, or restructured pursuant to this Code section with respect to real property may be delivered if the lesser of either of the following is exceeded:

(A) The average annual payments on the aggregate of all such outstanding contracts exceed 7.5 percent of the governmental fund revenues of the county or municipality for the calendar year preceding the delivery of such contract plus any available special county 1 percent sales and use tax proceeds collected pursuant to Code Section 48-8-111; or

(B) The outstanding principal balance on the aggregate of all such outstanding contracts exceeds $25 million; provided, however, that with respect to any county or municipality in which, prior to July 1, 2000, the outstanding principal balance on the aggregate of outstanding contracts exceeds $25 million, such outstanding contracts may be renewed, refinanced, or restructured, but no new contracts shall be developed and executed until the outstanding principal balance on such outstanding contracts has been reduced so that the $25 million limitation of this subparagraph, or the limitation in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, whichever is lower, is not exceeded.

(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to contracts developed and executed or renewed, refinanced, or restructured pursuant to this Code section which are for projects or facilities:

(A) For the housing of court services, where any other state law or laws authorize the project or facility to be financed and paid for from the collection of fines rather than from tax revenues; or

(B) Which have been previously approved in the most recent referendum calling for the levy of a special county 1 percent sales and use tax pursuant to Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 48.

(i) Any such contract may provide for the payment by the county or municipality of interest or the allocation of a portion of the contract payment to interest, provided that the contract is in compliance with this Code section.

(j) Nothing in this Code section shall restrict counties or municipalities from executing reasonable contracts arising out of their proprietary functions.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-13, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1954, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 441, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1443, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 272, § 1/HB 473.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Two 1988 Acts added a new Code Section 36-60-12. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the Code section enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1847 has retained the Code Section 36-60-12 designation and the Code section enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1954 has been redesignated as Code Section 36-60-13.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, "Code section" was substituted for "Code Section" in the first occurrence of the words in the introductory language of subsection (b).

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 55, repealed Ga. L. 1988, p. 1954, § 2, providing for the terms and conditions under which counties or municipalities may enter into certain one year, or less, contracts. For present provisions, see Code Section 36-60-14.

Law reviews. - For annual survey on local government law, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 359 (1990). For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005); and 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006). For survey article on local government law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (2015).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - O.C.G.A. § 36-60-13 does not violate the constitutional debt limitations of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I. Barkley v. City of Rome, 259 Ga. 355, 381 S.E.2d 34 (1989).

Contract under section is not debt. - Contract which satisfies the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-60-13 does not constitute a "debt" within the meaning of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I and therefore does not require voter approval. Barkley v. City of Rome, 259 Ga. 355, 381 S.E.2d 34 (1989).

Lease agreement is not debt. - There is no distinction in O.C.G.A. § 36-60-13 between real and personal property and the strictures on leases for each class of property are the same; similarly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I(a), providing for a popular vote on the assumption of debt, makes no distinction between the two classes of property. Therefore, a county's decision to enter a lease purchase agreement with the Association of County Commissioners of Georgia to finance and construct a new courthouse was not a debt requiring a vote under Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I(a) and was in compliance with O.C.G.A. § 36-60-13 because it did not require future county commissioners to renew the contract, it allowed the county to terminate its financial obligations at the end of each calendar year, and it would never require the county to expend more than would be legally available under O.C.G.A. § 36-60-13. Bauerband v. Jackson County, 278 Ga. 222, 598 S.E.2d 444 (2004).

Contract as to provision of legal services. - O.C.G.A. § 36-60-13 did not apply to regulate over contract between county commissioners and county attorney for the provision of legal services. Brennan v. Chatham County Comm'rs, 209 Ga. App. 177, 433 S.E.2d 597 (1993).

Requirements of section violated. - Multi-year computer lease purchase agreement entered into by the county violated the requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-60-13; therefore, the trial court properly granted the county's motion for summary judgment. Wasilkoff v. Douglas County, 227 Ga. App. 232, 488 S.E.2d 722 (1997) (events occurred prior to 1996 amendment).

Multiyear lease provision ambiguous. - Multiyear lease provision allowing termination of the lease pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-60-13 was ambiguous and the record did not show whether a county and the county's lessee intended the provision to apply generally to the lease or only if § 36-60-13 became applicable (i.e., appropriated funds were no longer available to allow the county to perform the county's obligations under lease). Thus, the county's right to terminate the lease under that provision was a fact issue for the jury to resolve. Etowah Valley Sporting Clay Park, LLC v. Dawson County, 294 Ga. App. 586, 669 S.E.2d 436 (2008), cert. denied, No. S09C0464, 2009 Ga. LEXIS 266 (Ga. 2009).

Settlement agreement enforceable. - Trial court erred in denying a property owner's motion for summary judgment in a county breach of contract action because a settlement agreement between the parties was enforceable; the county attorney had authority to make the settlement offer on behalf of the county board, and while a vote in a public meeting was a required formality to effectuate the purchase, the board's failure to complete that formality when voting in the public meeting could not destroy an already existing settlement agreement. Old Peachtree Partners, LLC v. Gwinnett County, 315 Ga. App. 342, 726 S.E.2d 437 (2012).

Cited in CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 196 F. Supp. 2d 1288 (S.D. Ga. 2002); Marlowe v. Colquitt County, 278 Ga. App. 184, 628 S.E.2d 622 (2006).

36-60-14. Authority to enter into certain one-year, or less, contracts; exception.

Statute text

The governing body of each county or municipal corporation of this state is authorized to enter into one year, or less, contracts with private nonprofit organizations which are exempt from federal income taxes pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code to utilize such organizations to identify, attract, and locate new business and industry into the county or municipality for the purposes of increasing trade, industry, agribusiness, commerce, and tourism and the improvement of employment opportunities within the county or municipality and to otherwise promote the general welfare of the county or municipality; provided, however, that the authority provided under this Code section shall not affect or in any way apply to any contract under Code Section 48-13-51 regarding the expenditure of proceeds collected under Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 48 unless that contract is executed by the governing body of a county in which is imposed, prior to January 1, 2001, the homestead option sales and use tax authorized under Code Section 48-8-102.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-14, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 36; Ga. L. 2001, p. 100, § 1.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 55, part of an Act to correct errors and omissions in the Code effective February 16, 1990, repealed § 2 of Ga. L. 1988, p. 1954. Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 36, codified the subject matter of Ga. L. 1988, p. 1954, § 2 as this Code section.

U.S. Code. - Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this Code section, is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501.

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 189 (2001).

36-60-15. Property subject to contract for lease purchase or installment purchase.

Statute text

Each county or municipality in this state is authorized to accept the title to property subject to a contract for lease purchase or installment purchase and is authorized to transfer title back to the vendor in the name of the county or municipality in the event that the contract is not fully consummated.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-15, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 254, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Two 1990 Acts added a new Code Section 36-60-14. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the Code section enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 8 has retained the Code Section 36-60-14 designation and the Code section enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 254 has been redesignated as Code Section 36-60-15.

36-60-15.1. Operation and maintenance of water treatment systems by private entities.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any county or municipal corporation of this state is authorized, in the discretion of its governing authority, to enter into valid and binding leases and contracts with private persons, firms, associations, or corporations for any period of time not to exceed 20 years to provide for the operation and maintenance of all or a portion of its waste-water treatment system, storm-water system, water system, or sewer system, or any combination of such systems, which leases and contracts may include provisions for the design, construction, repair, reconditioning, replacement, maintenance, and operation of the system, or any combination of such services and functions. If a contract or lease to be awarded pursuant to this Code section includes provisions for the construction of public works, the laws relating to the procurement of such contracts shall also apply; provided, however, that any bonding requirements shall apply only to the construction provisions of the contract or lease. Prior to entering into a lease or contract pursuant to this Code section, the governing authority shall solicit competitive sealed proposals. The governing authority shall first establish criteria for evaluation of any applicants submitting proposals on such leases or contracts for the purpose of assisting the governing authority in making a review of such applicants' previous performance on projects of comparable magnitude, the environmental compliance record of such applicants, and any relevant civil or criminal penalties incurred by such applicants during the five years immediately preceding the execution of the lease or contract. The governing authority shall take into consideration such information to assist it in determining the eligibility of any applicant. The award of a lease or contract pursuant to this Code section shall be made to the responsible and responsive applicant whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the governmental entity, taking into consideration the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. All information required by the county or municipality pursuant to this Code section shall be provided by the applicant under oath. For purposes of this Code section, "applicant" means any individual, firm, association, or corporation submitting a proposal on such leases or contracts.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-15.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 80, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 837, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Water resources, T. 12, C. 5.

36-60-16. Separate approval of municipal and county consolidation by referendum.

Statute text

No municipal and county consolidation shall become effective unless such consolidation is separately approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting in a referendum thereon in each affected county or counties and in each affected municipality or municipalities located within such county or counties containing at least 10 percent of the population of the county participating in the consolidation. No municipal and county consolidation approved pursuant to this Code section shall include within the consolidated government any municipality located within a county containing less than 10 percent of the population of such county unless such consolidation is separately approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting in a referendum thereon in such municipality. Referendums held pursuant to this Code section shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions and requirements of Title 21.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-16, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 394, § 1.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Meaning of "county." - "County", as used in O.C.G.A. § 36-60-16, means the whole county, not just the unincorporated portion thereof. 1995 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U95-5.

36-60-17. Water supplier's cut off of water to property because of indebtedness of prior owner, occupant, or lessee prohibited; records required; statement of past due amounts; limited liens for unpaid charges for water, gas, sewerage service, or electricity.

Statute text

(a) No public or private water supplier shall refuse to supply water to any single or multifamily residential property for which water has been furnished through the use of a separate water meter for each residential unit on application of the owner or new tenant of such property because of the indebtedness of a prior owner, prior occupant, or prior lessee to the water supplier for water previously furnished to such property.

(b) For each new or current account to supply water, the public and private water suppliers shall maintain a record of identifying information on the applicant for the water service and shall seek reimbursement of unpaid charges for water service furnished initially from the person who incurred the charges.

(c) (1) Any real property owner or tenant, person having executed a contract for the purchase or occupancy of real property, attorney closing a real estate transaction for the purchase of real property, or lender considering the loan of funds to be secured by real property shall be entitled upon request to a statement from a public or private water supplier setting forth the amount of water charges currently and past due and any late charges and interest applicable for water supplied to such property. Such request shall:

(A) Be in writing;

(B) State the address of the real property for which water was supplied;

(C) Be delivered to the billing address of the public or private water supplier by certified mail, return receipt requested, statutory overnight delivery, or electronic means if electronic communication is permitted by such supplier; and

(D) State a return address or e-mail address to which the statement reflecting the moneys owed is to be directed.

(2) Any request transmitted by electronic means shall be considered received on the first business day following such transmission.

(3) The public or private water supplier shall furnish such statement to the requestor by certified mail, return receipt requested, statutory overnight delivery, or electronic means if electronic communication is provided by the requestor within ten business days of receipt of such request. Such supplier may charge a fee not to exceed $10.00 to provide the requested information.

(4) The failure of the public or private water supplier to provide such statement within such ten business day period shall:

(A) Cause any lien for unpaid charges provided by this Code section to be extinguished and to be of no force or effect as to the title acquired by the purchaser or lender, if any, and their respective successors and assigns in the transaction contemplated in connection with such request; and

(B) Prevent the public or private water supplier from denying water services to the new real property owner or tenant.

(5) The information specified in the public or private water supplier's statement shall be binding upon the public or private water supplier as of the date of the statement and for 30 days thereafter. When payment in full is tendered within such 30 day period, it shall extinguish any lien by operation of law which the public or private water supplier may have against such property.

(d) A public or private water supplier shall not impose a lien against real property to secure unpaid charges for water furnished unless the owner of such real property is the person who incurred the charges and shall not deny water services when such a lien has been extinguished.

(e) This Code section shall not apply to associations that are subject to Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 44 which supply water.

(f) A public or private supplier of gas, sewerage service, or electricity shall not impose a lien against real property to secure unpaid charges for gas, sewerage service, or electricity unless the owner of such real property is the person who incurred the charges.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-17, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1957, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 240, § 1/SB 206.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey on local government law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 255 (2009). For annual survey on real property law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 301 (2009).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Pre-emption of city ordinance as to discontinuance of water service. - Pursuant to the uniformity clause of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV(a), § 154-120(1) of the Code of Ordinances of the City of Atlanta, Ga., which authorized the discontinuance of water service until a bill was paid, was pre-empted by O.C.G.A. § 36-60-17(a), which did not allow a supplier to refuse to supply water to a water meter because of a prior owner's indebtedness. Fed. Home Loan Mortg. Corp. v. City of Atlanta, 285 Ga. 189, 674 S.E.2d 905 (2009).

Statute not applicable to commercial property. - Trial court properly granted summary judgment to a city on a property owner's claims that the city unlawfully refused to supply water service to the owner's commercial property until the former tenant's water service charges were paid as the prohibition against refusing to supply water to certain property did not apply to non-residential property under O.C.G.A. § 36-60-17(a). Solid Equities, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 308 Ga. App. 895, 710 S.E.2d 165 (2011).

City ordinance properly permitted heightened status lien. - Section 154-120 of the Code of Ordinances of the City of Atlanta, Ga., was not in conflict with O.C.G.A. § 36-60-17(c) as the ordinance expressly recognized that the city's ability to impose a lien on real property on the basis of unpaid water bills for service to that property was limited by § 36-60-17, which only granted a heightened-status lien for unpaid water charges incurred by the owner as opposed to a non-owner occupant. Fed. Home Loan Mortg. Corp. v. City of Atlanta, 285 Ga. 189, 674 S.E.2d 905 (2009).

36-60-17.1. Localities prohibited from requiring connection with or use of water supplied by a public water system except when other water unfit; charges or fees for services made available but not used prohibited; applicability.

Statute text

(a) No county, municipality, or local authority shall require a single-family residential property owner or farm served by a private well to connect with or use water supplied by a public water system, except where necessary to preclude the use of water obtained from such private well that is demonstrably unfit for human consumption or other intended use; nor shall it require such single-family residential property owner or farm whose water lines are not connected with such public water system to pay any charge or fee for water supply services made available but not used.

(b) Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall preclude the repair or maintenance of a well serving a single-family residence so as to meet the requirements for allowing continued use of the same by a single-family residential property owner or farm without connecting to a public water system or payment of charges or fees in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section. Such repairs shall be the sole responsibility of such owner.

(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall not apply to:

(1) Any public water system having more than a total of 70,000 active service connection accounts or more than 200 such accounts per square mile of total area served;

(2) A public water system with respect to a single-family residential property owner or farm who has been mailed written notice to his or her address of record on the property tax rolls by the appropriate county, municipality, or local authority by certified mail of his or her right to opt out of connecting with such system and paying charges or fees for system services made available but not used, if such property owner did not notify the county, municipality, or local authority in writing on a form provided thereby of his or her decision to exercise that option within 45 days after mailing of such notice by the county, municipality, or local authority;

(3) Any project of a public water system for which revenue bonds have been validated, issued, and sold prior to January 1, 2008; or

(4) Any public water system funded primarily through a federal or state grant that contains stipulations in such grant requiring the county, municipality, or local authority to levy a charge or fee for water supply services made available but not used. For all state grants, loans, or contracts for services issued on and after July 1, 2007, no state grant, loan, or contract for services funding any project of a public water system shall contain any stipulations requiring a county, municipality, or local authority to levy a charge or fee for water supply services made available but not used or requiring a county, municipality, or local authority to require single-family property owners or farms to connect with or use water supplied by a public water system, except where necessary to preclude the use of water obtained from another source that is demonstrably unfit for human consumption or other intended use. For the purposes of this paragraph, a federal grant is defined as money provided directly to a county or municipality. Federal money provided to a revolving loan fund or to the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority or such other mechanism shall not be considered a federal grant.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-17.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 737, § 2/HB 247; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

36-60-17.2. Limited exemption from storm water fees.

Statute text

Land located within a railroad's right of way and covered with ballast and rail shall be exempt from any fees imposed by any county or municipality for the management, collection, or disposal of storm water; provided, however, that railroad stations, maintenance buildings, or other developed land used for railroad purposes shall not be exempt from storm-water fees.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-17.2, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 944, § 1/HB 735.)

Annotations

Effective date. - This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

36-60-18. Obtaining real property within adjoining county which will be exchanged for federal property.

Statute text

No county or municipality within the county shall purchase or accept title to any real property located in an adjoining county, which property will be exchanged for certain property belonging to the federal government as authorized by federal law, without the written consent of the governing authority of such adjoining county wherein the real property is located; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to the exercise of eminent domain by a county or municipality as authorized under the Constitution or other provisions of law; provided, further, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any agreement entered into by two or more counties, municipal corporations, consolidated governments, or development authorities or any combination thereof prior to July 1, 1994, nor shall the transfer of any land pursuant to any such agreement be affected by this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-18, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1940, § 2.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, this Code section, originally designated as Code Section 36-60-16, was redesignated as Code Section 36-60-18.

36-60-19. Dispatch centers; required training for communications officers; exceptions; penalty for noncompliance.

Statute text

(a) On and after January 1, 1999, every dispatch center operated by any county or municipality to receive, process, or transmit public safety information and dispatch law enforcement officers, firefighters, medical personnel, or emergency management personnel shall comply with the requirements of this Code section. Each such dispatch center shall have on duty at all times at least one communications officer who is certified as having been trained in the use of telecommunications devices for the deaf (TDD's), as provided for in subsection (d) of Code Section 35-8-23. However, a dispatch center which is staffed by ten or fewer communications officers shall be considered in compliance with this Code section; provided, however, that on and after January 1, 1999, no dispatch center shall be permitted to employ any additional or replacement communications officers who are not certified as having been trained in the use of telecommunications devices for the deaf (TDD's) as provided for in subsection (d) of Code Section 35-8-23.

(b) On and after January 1, 1999, no monthly 9-1-1 charge provided for in Code Section 46-5-133 may be imposed for the support of any dispatch center unless such dispatch center is in compliance with the requirements of this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-19, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 540, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 6/HB 470.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, Code Section 36-60-19 as enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 850, § 1, was redesignated as 36-60-20, and Code Section 36-60-19 as enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 928, § 1, was redesignated as 36-60-21.

Law reviews. - For review of 1998 legislation relating to state government, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 245 (1998).

36-60-20. Political subdivisions have no liability for losses from any failure or malfunction of computer software.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "political subdivision of the state" means any office, agency, department, commission, board, division, and institution of any county or municipality of the State of Georgia.

(b) A political subdivision of the state shall have no liability for losses from any failure or malfunction occurring before December 31, 2005, which is caused directly or indirectly by the failure of computer software or any device containing a computer processor to accurately or properly recognize, calculate, display, sort, or otherwise process dates or times, if the failure or malfunction causing the loss was unforeseeable or if the failure or malfunction causing the loss was foreseeable but the plan or design or both for identifying and preventing the failure or malfunction was prepared in substantial compliance with generally accepted computer and information system design standards in effect at the time of the preparation of the plan or design.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-60-20, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 850, § 1.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, Code Section 36-60-19 as enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 850, § 1, was redesignated as 36-60-20.

36-60-21. Contracts with private companies to construct and operate private toll roads and bridges to facilitate public transportation without additional tax revenues.

Statute text
